Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-616
Health care provider; exercise medical judgment.

In following the decision of a surrogate, a health care provider shall exercise the same independent medical judgment that the health care provider would exercise in following the decision of the individual if the individual were not incapable.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 16.